Massachusetts, session 194th, S1122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 222 the following new sections:-
Section 223.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
“Covered entity”, any of the following entities, or any of their agents, officers,
employees, agencies, or departments: the Commonwealth, any law enforcement agency, or any
county, city, town, district, or authority in the Commonwealth.
“Immigration collaboration agreement”, any contract, agreement, memorandum of
understanding or other arrangement, whether formal or informal, that grants federal immigration
of 3

enforcement authority or powers to any covered entity, including, but not limited to, an
agreement made pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g).
“Immigration detention agreement”, any contract, agreement, memorandum of
understanding, intergovernmental service agreement, or other arrangement, whether formal or
informal, with any covered entity to arrest, detain, or house any person for the purpose of civil
immigration detention.
“Law enforcement agency”, an agency in the Commonwealth charged with enforcement
of state and municipal laws or with managing custody of detained or incarcerated persons in the
state, including, but not limited to, municipal police departments, sheriff’s departments, campus
police departments, hospital police departments, the Department of Corrections, Massachusetts
State Police, the Department of Youth Services, and any council, consortium, or professional
association of any of the foregoing entities.
(b) After the effective date of this Act, no covered entity may:
(1) enter into an immigration collaboration agreement or immigration detention
agreement; or
(2) extend or renew an existing immigration collaboration agreement or immigration
detention agreement.
(c) Any party to an existing agreement governed by this section shall terminate such
agreement as soon as practicable; provided that any immigration collaboration agreement shall
be terminated no later than 30 days from the effective date of this Act and any immigration
detention agreement shall be terminated no later than 90 days from the effective date of this Act.
of 3

(d) Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that any person or entity is
violating the provisions of this section, the Attorney General may bring an action in the name of
the Commonwealth against such person or entity to restrain such violation by temporary
restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction. The action may be brought in the
Superior Court of the county in which such violation is occurring or is reasonably anticipated to
occur, or in the Superior Court of Suffolk County, at the Attorney General’s election. Nothing
herein shall preclude a private action concerning any violation of this section against any person
or entity, to the extent otherwise permitted by law.
of 3